Tennessee, session 114, HB0479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 58, Chapter 1, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) This section is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee National Guard
Servicemember's Medical Readiness Act."
(b) The Tennessee national guard TRICARE premium reimbursement program
is created within the military department.
(c) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "eligible
recipient" means an individual who is:
(1) A member of the Tennessee national guard; and
(2) Eligible for TRICARE reserve select or TRICARE dental program
coverage.
(d) The military department may award reimbursement grants to an eligible
recipient who meets the reimbursement application requirements established by the
adjutant general for reimbursement of one (1) or both of the following:
(1) A premium paid for individual coverage for an eligible recipient
through the TRICARE reserve select program; or
(2) A premium paid for individual coverage for an eligible recipient
through the TRICARE dental program.
HB0479
001044
- 1 -

(e) If any portion of the premiums eligible for reimbursement in this section are
later paid for, reimbursed, or otherwise provided to an eligible recipient by the federal
government, then that portion shall cease to be reimbursed by the TRICARE premium
reimbursement program established in this section.
(f) The adjutant general shall adopt and publish written policies and guidelines to
effectuate the purposes of this section.
SECTION 2. This act is not an appropriation of funds, and funds must not be obligated
or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general
appropriations act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001044